West Virginia, session 2026, HB5191.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. STATE ROAD SYSTEM. §17-4-56. Rumble strips required on double-yellow lined roads. (a) The commissioner shall require the placement of rumble strips on all double-yellow lined roads and highways.(b) Not later than July 1, 2026, the commissioner shall develop a plan by which rumble strips shall be placed on all double-yellow lined roads and highways. Implementation of such plan shall commence not later than September 1, 2026, and shall be completed not later than June 30, 2036.